en: Back & sides material: Composite; Cypress; Koa; Laminated wood; Mahogany; Maple; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Rosewood; Sapele; Walnut; Other
hu: Hátlap és oldalsó anyag: Kompozit; Ciprus; Koa; Laminált fa; Mahagóni; Juhar; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Rózsafa; Sapele; Diófa; Egyéb
lt-LT: Nugaros ir šonų medžiaga: Kompozitas; Kiparisas; Koa medis; Laminuota mediena; Raudonmedis; Klevas; Ovangkolas; Pau ferro medis; Palisandras; Sapelis; Riešutmedis; Kita
sl-SI: Material za hrbet in stranice: Kompozit; Cipresa; Koa; Laminiran les; Mahagonij; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Oreh; Drugo
ko: 후판 및 측판 재질: 복합재; 사이프러스; 코아; 접합목; 마호가니; 메이플; 오방콜; 파우 페로; 로즈우드; 사펠레; 월넛; 기타
nb: Materiale bak og på sidene: Kompositt; Sypress; Koa; Laminert tre; Mahogni; Lønn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Valnøtt; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на гърба и страните: Композитен материал; Кипарис; Коа; Ламинирано дърво; Махагон; Клен; Ованкол; Пау феро; Палисандър; Сапеле; Орех; Друго
sv: Material på baksidan och sidorna: Komposit; Cypress; Koa; Laminerat trä; Mahogny; Lönn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissander; Sapele; Valnöt; Övrigt
fi: Taustan ja sivujen materiaali: Komposiitti; Sypressi; Koa; Laminoitu puu; Mahonki; Vaahtera; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Ruusupuu; Sapele; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
ru: Материал задней и боковых частей: Композит; Кипарис; Коа; Ламинированное дерево; Махагони; Клен; Овангкол; Пау-ферро; Палисандр; Сапеле; Орех; Другое
pt-PT: Material das costas e laterais: Compósito; Cipreste; Koa; Madeira laminada; Mogno; Ácer; Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Pau-rosa; Sapele; Nogueira; Outro
de: Material für Rückseite und Seiten: Verbundwerkstoff; Zypresse; Koa; Schichtholz; Mahagoni; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Pau Ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Walnuss; Sonstige
da: Materiale bagpå og på siderne: Komposit; Cypres; Koa; Lamineret træ; Mahogni; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Valnød; Andet
cs: Materiál zadní strany a boků: Kompozit; Cypřiš; Koa; Laminované dřevo; Mahagon; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisandr; Sapele; Ořech; Jiné
pt-BR: Material das partes traseiras e laterais: Material composto; Cipreste; Koa; Madeira laminada; Mogno; Maple; Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Jacarandá; Sapele; Nogueira; Outro
el: Υλικό πίσω μέρους και πλευρών: Σύνθετο; Κυπαρίσσι; Koa; Ξύλο laminate; Μαόνι; Σφένδαμος; Οβανγκόλ; Πάου φέρο; Παλίσανδρος; Σαπέλε; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
es: Material de la parte trasera y los laterales: Material compuesto; Ciprés; Koa; Madera laminada; Caoba; Arce; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palo de rosa; Sapeli; Nogal; Otro
zh-CN: 背板和侧板材质: 复合材料; 柏木; 相思木; 胶合板; 桃花心木; 枫木; 古夷苏木; 保罗铁木; 玫瑰木; 沙比利木; 胡桃木; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal za leđa i bokove: Kompozit; Čempres; Koa; Laminirano drvo; Mahagonij; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Orah; Ostalo
zh-TW: 背側板材質: 複合材質; 柏木; 相思木; 合板; 桃花心木; 楓木; 歐文科爾木; 玻利維亞玫瑰木; 玫瑰木; 沙比利木; 胡桃木; 其他
ro-RO: Material pentru spate și laturi: Compozit; Chiparos; Koa; Lemn laminat; Mahon; Arțar; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisandru; Sapele; Nuc; Altele
ja: 背面と側面の素材: コンポジット; サイプレス; コア; 合板; マホガニー; メイプル; オバンコール; パーフェロー; ローズウッド; サペリ; ウォルナット; その他
nl: Achter- en zijkanten materiaal: Composiet; Cipres; Koa; Gelamineerd hout; Mahoniehout; Esdoornhout; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissander; Sapele; Walnoothout; Overig
it: Materiale per retro e lati: Composito; Cipresso; Koa; Legno laminato; Mogano; Acero; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissandro; Sapele; Noce; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál zadnej a bočnej časti: Kompozit; Cyprus; Koa; Laminované drevo; Mahagón; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Orech; Iné
th: วัสดุด้านหลังและด้านข้าง: คอมโพสิต; ไม้ไซเปรส; ไม้โคอะ; ไม้ลามิเนต; ไม้มะฮอกกานี; ไม้เมเปิล; ไม้โอวังก์กอล; ไม้เปาเฟอร์โร; ไม้โรสวูด; ไม้ซาปีลี; ไม้วอลนัท; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau du dos et des éclisses: Composite; Cyprès; Koa; Bois laminé; Acajou; Érable; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissandre; Sapelli; Noyer; Autre
tr: Arka ve yan kısımlardaki malzeme: Kompozit; Selvi; Koa; Lamine ahşap; Maun; Akçaağaç; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Gül ağacı; Sapelli; Ceviz; Diğer
pl: Materiał tyłu i boków: Kompozyt; Cyprys; Koa; Drewno laminowane; Mahoń; Klon; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Sapele; Orzech; Inne
vi: Chất liệu mặt sau và hai bên: Composite; Gỗ bách; Gỗ Koa; Gỗ ép; Gỗ gụ; Gỗ phong; Gỗ Ovangkol; Gỗ pau ferro; Gỗ cẩm lai; Gỗ sapele; Gỗ óc chó; Khác